Washington statutes.
RCW 7.70.090

Hospital governing bodies—Liability—Limitations.

Members of the board of directors or other governing body of a public or private hospital are not individually liable for personal injuries or death resulting from health care administered by a health care provider granted privileges to provide health care at the hospital unless the decision to grant the privilege to provide health care at the hospital constitutes gross negligence.

[ 1987 c 212 s 1201; 1986 c 305 s 905.]

NOTES:

Preamble—Report to legislature—Applicability—Severability—1986 c 305: See notes following RCW 4.16.160.